Arkansas, session 2025, SB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-34-106(a), concerning the sale of
surplus computer equipment and electronics, is amended to read as follows:
(a) If an agency policy established under § 25-34-104 provides for the
preferential sale of surplus computer and electronic equipment to agency
employees, that computer and electronic equipment shall be sold at a price
determined by the Department of Finance and Administration Department of
Transformation and Shared Services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-34-109(b)(2), concerning the usage of
the Computer and Electronic Recycling Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Work with the Department of Finance and Administration
Department of Transformation and Shared Services and the Marketing and
Redistribution Section to establish statewide contracts for computer and
electronics recycling and demanufacturing businesses; and




*LGL058*
02/03/2025 4:39:58 PM LGL058